Utah statutes.
41-12a-304.   No-fault tort immunity ineffective.
The owner of a motor vehicle on which owner's or operator's security is
required under Section 41-12a-301 who fails to have the security in effect at
the time of an accident does not have immunity from tort liability under
Subsection 31A-22-309(1).  This owner is personally liable for the payment of
the benefits provided for under Section 31A-22-307 to persons entitled to
receive them under Section 31A-22-308.
